District of Columbia statutes.
9-1109.02

Authorization for interstate agreement.

The Mayor is hereby authorized to execute, on behalf of the District of Columbia, an agreement with the Commonwealth of Virginia and the State of Maryland for the creation and operation of a joint state oversight agency. Any such agency shall be an instrumentality of the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Virginia, and the State of Maryland. Any agreement executed by the Mayor to establish the agency shall, at a minimum, contain provisions that substantially satisfy the requirements set forth in § 9-1109.04.

History

Sept. 23, 1997, D.C. Law 12-20, § 3, 44 DCR 4023

Section References

This section is referenced in § 9-1109.04, § 9-1109.05, and § 9-1109.07.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2445.2.